apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON CASE-NONOM

! This continuation lexicon is a copy of the normal case lexicon,
! only it does not include nominative
!   1<num><nom> = 1, 1<num><acc> = 1-{N}{I}

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT-NONPRED ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н PRED ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} PRED ;

LEXICON CASE-ETC-NONOM

CASE-NONOM ;
!GENERAL-POSSESSIVE-ETC ; 

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM

!POSSESSIVES ;  ! huh?
POSSESSION ; 
CASE-ETC-NONOM ;

LEXICON SUBST-NONOM

N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р N-INFL-COMMON-NONOM ;


LEXICON SQRD
! This lexicon includes common ways of writing squared, cubed etc.

²%<num%>:2 # ;  ! Dir/LR
³%<num%>:3 # ;  ! Dir/LR
²%<num%>:² # ;
³%<num%>:³ # ;
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>:%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

%<num%>%<ord%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-%{I%}нч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%-ч%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-ш%{I%} # ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%-ч%{I%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! See PRON-COLL
!These are for numerals
!!  Defaults to subst reading; advl is secondary
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>:%-%{A%}%{U%} # ; ! FIXME: оо/өө
!! though apertium-kaz hasn't been updated to reflect this
!! so let's just include <subst> for now...
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%-%{A%}%{U%} # ; ! FIXME: оо/өө
%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>:%-%{A%}%>%{U%} SUBST-NONOM ;

%<num%>%<percent%>:%% # ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:%% # ;

%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{а%}%{з%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<num%>%<percent%>%<subst%>:%%%{э%}%{т%} SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

°С%<num%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:°С # ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ;
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:°С%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:ºС # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:ºС%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:С # ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
°С%<num%>%<subst%>:С%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

С%<num%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>%<nom%>:° # ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{у%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
С%<num%>%<subst%>:°%{э%}%{т%}%- SUBST-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR

! Measurement units

км:км SQRD ;
мм:мм SQRD ;
см:см SQRD ;
м:м SQRD ;

LEXICON LASTDIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{й%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "бир"
2:2%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "эки"
3:3%{ү%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "үч"
4:4%{ү%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "төрт"
5:5%{э%}%{т%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "беш"
6:6%{а%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алты"
7:7%{э%}                NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жети"
8:8%{э%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сегиз"
9:9%{у%}%{з%}           NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тогуз"

LEXICON LASTDIGIT-REST

1%0:1%0%{о%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "он"
2%0:2%0%{а%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жыйырма"
3%0:3%0%{у%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "отуз"
4%0:4%0%{а%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "кырк"
5%0:5%0%{ү%}            NUM-DIGIT ; ! "элүү"
6%0:6%0%{а%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "алтымыш"
7%0:7%0%{э%}%{т%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жетимиш"
8%0:8%0%{э%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "сексен"
9%0:9%0%{о%}%{з%}       NUM-DIGIT ; ! "токсон"

LEXICON POWERS
%0%0:%0%0%{ү%}%{з%}     NUM-DIGIT ; ! "жүз"
%0%0%0:%0%0%0%{э%}%{з%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "миң"

LEXICON LOOP

%,:%, DIGITLEX ;
%.:%. DIGITLEX ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT ;
%,:%, LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%.:%. LASTDIGIT-REST ;
%,:%, POWERS ;
%.:%. POWERS ;
      DIGITLEX ;
      LASTDIGIT ;
      LASTDIGIT-REST ;
      POWERS ;

!! merged from secondary DIGITLEX lexicon;
!! UPDATE: moved from DIGITLEX
!! CHECK: may not belong here!
%<num%>: # ; ! Copy from kaz



LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;




!==============================================================================!
!          N U M E R A L     L E X I C O N     E N D S     H E R E
!==============================================================================!


LEXICON CASES-DEFAULT
%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;              ! -     -      -
%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}н CLITICS-NO-COP ;   ! -нын, -нин, -дын, -дин, -тын, -тин, -нун, -нүн, -дун, -дүн, -тун, -түн
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;    ! -га, -ка, -ге, -ке, -го, -ко, -гө, -кө
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;    ! -ны, -ни, -ды, -ди, -ты, -ти, -ну, -нү, -ду, -дү, -ту, -тү
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;  ! -да, -де, -та, -те, -до, -дө, -то, -тө

LEXICON CASES
CASES-DEFAULT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! -DA and -DAn can be predicates

LEXICON CASES-PX12SG
CASES-DEFAULT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ; ! Dir/LR 
%<abl%>:%>%{A%}н CLITICS-INCL-COP ;


!LEXICON CASES-SINGULAR-PRONOUNS
!! %<px1sg%>%<nom%>:      ! Is this necessary?
!! %<px1sg%>%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}н  ! Is this necessary, since it looks normal?
!%<px1sg%>%<acc%>:%>н
!%<px1sg%>%<abl%>:%>н%{A%}н
!%<px1sg%>%<loc%>:%>нд%{A%}
!%<px1sg%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%}
!%<px1sg%>%<locattr%>:%>нд%{A%}г%{I%}
!
!! %<px3sp%>%<nom%>: # ;          ! Is this necessary?
!! %<px3sp%>%<gen%>:%>н%{I%}н # ; ! Is this necessary, since it looks normal?
!%<px3sp%>%<acc%>:%>н # ;
!%<px3sp%>%<abl%>:%>н%{A%}н # ;
!%<px3sp%>%<loc%>:%>нд%{A%} # ;
!%<px3sp%>%<dat%>:%>н%{A%} # ;
!%<px3sp%>%<locattr%>:%>нд%{A%}г%{I%} # ;

LEXICON NIKI

%<gen%>%<subst%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ;
%<gen%>%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASES ;
! %<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; ! Dir/RL
! %<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CLITICS-NO-COP ; ! Dir/RL ! FMT: in -kaz this is what the gerunds get.

LEXICON DAY

%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й PRED ;  ! -дай, -дей, -дөй, -дой, -тай, -тей, -төй, той
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CASES ;   ! FIXME: should these be sim.subst?
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й PLURAL ;
%<equ%>:%>ч%{A%} PRED ; ! -ча, -чо, -че, -чө

LEXICON GEN-POS
CASES ;
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; !CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 
!!%<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} ADJ-DAGI ;
!%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} DAGI ;
!!%<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CASES ;
!!%<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} V-ADJ ; ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this
NIKI ;
DAGI ;
DAY ;

LEXICON GEN-POS-PX12SG
CASES-PX12SG ;
!%<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%}%{n%} CASES ; !CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 
!%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} DAGI ;
!! %<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} CASES ;
!!%<locattr%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}г%{I%} V-ADJ ; ! FIXME: when we go recursive, use this
NIKI ;
DAGI ;

!! LEXICON GEN-POS-SHORT-ACC
!! CASES-SHORT-ACC ;
!! %<px%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}к%{I%} CASES-SHORT-ACC ; 

LEXICON POSSESSION
GEN-POS ;
POSSESSION-ENDINGS ;

LEXICON POSSESSION-ENDINGS  ! P_2
%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м GEN-POS-PX12SG ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң GEN-POS-PX12SG ; 
%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р GEN-POS ; 
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р GEN-POS ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}м # ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң # ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з # ; 
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}б%{I%}з # ; 
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{A%}р # ; 
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>%[%+p3pl%]:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON EXI

%<adj%>: # ;
%<adj%>: ATTR ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: POSSESSION ;

LEXICON ABESSIVE-SUFFIX

%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON LUU-SUFFIX

%+луу%<post%>:%>%{L%}%{U%}%{U%} CLITICS-NO-COP ;

LEXICON SUBST-COMMON

%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р POSSESSION ;
%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ;

POSSESSION ;
ABESSIVE-SUFFIX ; 
LUU-SUFFIX ; 

LEXICON Pronouns
ким%<prn%>%<itg%>%<px3sp%>:кими%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GEN-POS "weight: 0.8" ;
бул%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:быяк POSSESSION ; ! "here"
ал%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:аяк POSSESSION ; ! "there"
кай%<det%>%<dem%>%+жак%<n%>:каяк POSSESSION ; ! "where"
LEXICON Adjectives
бар:бар EXI ;
жок:жок EXI ;
